Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB54.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 209A.122 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Center" means the Criminal Justice Statistical Analysis Center created in
KRS 15.280;
(b) "Corollary victim" means an individual other than the victim who is directly
impacted by domestic violence and abuse or dating violence and abuse, either
through relationship or proximity;
(c) "Domestic violence fatalities" means deaths that occur as a result of domestic
violence and abuse or dating violence and abuse, and includes but is not
limited to homicides, related suicides, and corollary victims; and
(d) "Near fatality" means a crime where serious physical injury as defined in KRS
500.080 occurs.
(2) The center shall:
(a) Collect information on domestic violence fatalities, domestic violence and
abuse, and dating violence and abuse within the Commonwealth from
subsections (3) to (5) of this section; and
(b) Produce an annual report by July 1 of each year and submit the report to the:
1. Kentucky Coalition Against Domestic Violence;
2. Governor;
3. Cabinet for Health and Family Services;
4. Interim Joint Committee on Judiciary;
5. Interim Joint Committee on Families and Children; and
6. Legislative Research Commission.
The Kentucky Coalition Against Domestic Violence may provide the agencies
listed in paragraph (b)1. to 6. of this subsection with best practices and any other
Page 1 of 6
XXXX 1/2/2025 11:46 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 262
recommendations for public policy by November 1 of each year.
(3) (a) The Department of Kentucky State Police shall provide the center with:
1. The number of domestic violence and abuse and dating violence and
abuse calls for service to which the Kentucky State Police and
associated law enforcement agencies responded;
2. The number of arrests by Kentucky State Police and associated agencies
in response to calls of domestic violence and abuse or dating violence
and abuse; and
3. If an arrest was made, the arresting offense charged by Kentucky State
Police or associated law enforcement agencies.
(b) The Department of Kentucky State Police shall separately provide the center
with information reported to the Law Information Network of Kentucky
(LINK). The Department of Kentucky State Police shall provide the center
with the:
1. Number of orders of protection received to be served by law
enforcement agencies;
2. Number of orders of protection served by law enforcement agencies;
3. Number of orders of protection in LINK; and
4. Average time for actual service to be returned.
(4) The Administrative Office of the Courts shall provide the center with:
(a) The number and type of petitions for orders of protection filed and denied
under KRS 403.725;
(b) The number and type of petitions for interpersonal violence orders filed and
denied under KRS 456.030;
(c) The number of emergency protective orders granted under KRS 403.730 and
temporary interpersonal protective orders granted under KRS 456.040;
(d) The number of emergency protective orders rescinded without prejudice
Page 2 of 6
XXXX 1/2/2025 11:46 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 262
under Section 2 of this Act and interpersonal protective orders rescinded
without prejudice under Section 3 of this Act;
(e)[(d)] The number of domestic violence orders granted under KRS 403.740
and interpersonal protective orders granted under 456.060, excluding
amended or corrected orders;
(f)[(e)] The relationship between the petitioner and the respondent, if known;
(g)[(f)] Demographics of the parties, including age, race, and gender;
(h)[(g)] Information on whether the victim was or is pregnant, if indicated on the
petition; and
(i)[(h)] The number of criminal charges for a violation of an order of protection.
(5) The Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall provide the center with:
(a) The number of reports of alleged child abuse made to the cabinet through an
adult or child abuse hotline in which there were also allegations of domestic
violence; and
(b) Domestic violence and abuse and dating violence and abuse shelter statistics
reported to the cabinet, including but not limited to the:
1. Number of minors served in shelter;
2. Number of minors served in non-shelter services;
3. Number of adults served in shelter;
4. Number of adults served in non-shelter services;
5. Demographics, including age and race;
6. Number of crisis or hotline calls;
7. Number of minors receiving:
a. Crisis intervention;
b. Victim advocacy services; and
c. Individual or group counseling or support group; and
8. Number of adult victims receiving:
Page 3 of 6
XXXX 1/2/2025 11:46 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 262
a. Crisis intervention;
b. Victim advocacy services;
c. Individual or group counseling or support group;
d. Criminal or civil legal advocacy;
e. Medical accompaniment; and
f. Transportation services.
Section 2. KRS 403.735 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Prior to or at a hearing on a petition for an order of protection:
(a) The court may obtain the respondent's Kentucky criminal and protective order
history and utilize that information to assess what relief and which sanctions
may protect against danger to the petitioner or other person for whom
protection is being sought, with the information so obtained being provided to
the parties in accordance with the Kentucky Rules of Civil Procedure; and
(b) If the petitioner or respondent is a minor, the court shall inquire whether the
parties attend school in the same school system to assist the court in imposing
conditions in the order that have the least disruption in the administration of
education to the parties while providing appropriate protection to the
petitioner.
(2) (a) If the adverse party is not present at the hearing ordered pursuant to KRS
403.730 and has not been served, a previously issued emergency protective
order shall remain in place, and the court shall direct the issuance of a new
summons for a hearing set not more than fourteen (14) days in the future. If
service has not been made on the adverse party before that hearing or a
subsequent hearing, the emergency protective order shall remain in place, and
the court shall continue the hearing and issue a new summons with a new date
and time for the hearing to occur, which shall be within fourteen (14) days of
the originally scheduled date for the continued hearing. The court shall repeat
Page 4 of 6
XXXX 1/2/2025 11:46 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 262
the process of continuing the hearing and reissuing a new summons until the
adverse party is served in advance of the scheduled hearing. If service has not
been made on the respondent at least seventy-two (72) hours prior to the
scheduled hearing, the court may continue the hearing no more than fourteen
(14) days in the future. In issuing the summons, the court shall simultaneously
transmit a copy of the summons or notice of its issuance and provisions to the
petitioner.
(b) The provisions of this section permitting the continuance of an emergency
protective order shall be limited to twelve (12)[six (6)] months from the
issuance of the emergency protective order. If the respondent has not been
served within that period, the order shall be rescinded without prejudice. Prior
to the expiration of the emergency protective order, the court shall provide
notice to the petitioner stating that, if the petitioner does not file a new
petition, the order shall be rescinded without prejudice.
Section 3. KRS 456.050 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Prior to or at a hearing on a petition for an interpersonal protective order:
(a) The court may obtain the respondent's Kentucky criminal and protective order
history and utilize that information to assess what relief and which sanctions
may protect against danger to the petitioner or other person for whom
protection is being sought, with the information so obtained being provided to
the parties in accordance with the Kentucky Rules of Civil Procedure; and
(b) If the petitioner or respondent is a minor, the court shall inquire whether the
parties attend school in the same school system to assist the court in imposing
conditions in the order that have the least disruption in the administration of
education to the parties while providing appropriate protection to the
petitioner.
(2) (a) If the adverse party is not present at the hearing ordered pursuant to KRS
Page 5 of 6
XXXX 1/2/2025 11:46 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 262
456.040 and has not been served, a previously issued temporary interpersonal
protective order shall remain in place, and the court shall direct the issuance
of a new summons for a hearing set not more than fourteen (14) days in the
future. If service has not been made on the adverse party before that hearing
or a subsequent hearing, the temporary interpersonal protective order shall
remain in place, and the court shall continue the hearing and issue a new
summons with a new date and time for the hearing to occur, which shall be
within fourteen (14) days of the originally scheduled date for the continued
hearing. The court shall repeat the process of continuing the hearing and
reissuing a new summons until the adverse party is served in advance of the
scheduled hearing. If service has not been made on the respondent at least
seventy-two (72) hours prior to the scheduled hearing, the court may continue
the hearing no more than fourteen (14) days in the future. In issuing the
summons, the court shall simultaneously transmit a copy of the summons or
notice of its issuance and provisions to the petitioner.
(b) The provisions of this section permitting the continuance of an interpersonal
protective order shall be limited to twelve (12)[six (6)] months from the
issuance of the temporary interpersonal protective order. If the respondent has
not been served within that period, the order shall be rescinded without
prejudice. Prior to the expiration of the temporary interpersonal protective
order, the court shall provide notice to the petitioner stating that, if the
petitioner does not file a new petition, the order shall be rescinded without
prejudice.
Page 6 of 6
XXXX 1/2/2025 11:46 AM Jacketed